Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.330

Acquisition, construction, equipping and betterment of lands, buildings and facilities at universities and The Evergreen State College—Nonliability of state.

The state shall incur no liability by reason of the exercise of the authority granted in RCW 28B.10.300.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.330. Prior: 1961 c 229 s 5; prior: 1950 ex.s. c 17 s 1, part; 1947 c 64 s 1, part; 1933 ex.s. c 23 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 91 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4543-1, part. Formerly RCW 28.76.210.]